Hawaii statutes.
§480E-2 Definitions. As used in
this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Consideration" means any payment or
thing of value provided to an owner of a distressed property, including
reasonable costs paid to independent third parties necessary to complete the
distressed property conveyance or payment of money to satisfy a debt or legal
obligation of an owner of the distressed property. "Consideration"
shall not include any amounts paid or to be paid directly or indirectly to the distressed
property purchaser, including amounts identified as "gift equity",
"fees", "escrow", or "down payment".

"Distressed property" means any
residential real property that:

(1) Is in foreclosure or at risk of foreclosure
because payment of any loan that is secured by the residential real property is
more than sixty days delinquent;

(2) Had a lien or encumbrance charged against it
because of nonpayment of any taxes, lease assessments, association fees, or
maintenance fees;

(3) Is at risk of having a lien or encumbrance
charged against it because the payments of any taxes, lease assessments,
association fees, or maintenance fees are more than ninety days delinquent;

(4) Secures a loan for which a notice of default has
been given;

(5) Secures a loan that has been accelerated; or

(6) Is the subject of any solicitation,
representation, offer, agreement, promise, or contract to perform any mortgage
assistance relief service.

"Distressed
property consultant" means any person who performs or provides, or
attempts to perform or provide, or who arranges for others to perform or
provide, or who assists others to perform or provide, or who makes any
solicitation, representation, or offer to perform or provide, any mortgage
assistance relief service.

"Distressed property consultant"
shall not include any of the following:

(1) A person or the person's authorized agent acting
under the express authority or written approval of the federal Department of
Housing and Urban Development;

(2) A person who holds or is owed an obligation
secured by a lien on any distressed property, or a person acting under the
express authorization or written approval of such person, when the person
performs services in connection with the obligation or lien, if the obligation
or lien did not arise as the result of or as part of a proposed distressed
property conveyance;

(3) Banks, savings banks, savings and loan
associations, credit unions, trust companies, depository and nondepository
financial service loan companies, and insurance companies organized, chartered,
or holding a certificate of authority to do business under the laws of this
State or any other state, or under the laws of the United States;

(4) Attorneys
licensed in the State of Hawaii engaged in the practice of law;

(5) Certified public accountants licensed under
chapter 466, persons holding a permit to practice public accountancy in the
State of Hawaii, and persons holding a valid certified public accountant
license issued under the laws of another state or territory who are lawfully
practicing in the State of Hawaii with a temporary permit to practice pursuant
to rules established by the board of public accountancy and who are subject to
regulation by the board of public accountancy while engaged in the practice of
public accountancy;

(6) A federal Department of Housing and Urban
Development approved mortgagee and any subsidiary or affiliate of these persons
or entities, and any agent or employee of these persons or entities, while
engaged in the business of these persons or entities;

(7) A nonprofit organization that, pursuant to
chapter 446, offers counseling or advice to an owner of a distressed property,
if the nonprofit organization has no contract or agreement for services with
lenders, distressed property purchasers, or any person who effects loans or
distressed property purchases; or

(8) A person currently licensed as an active real
estate broker or real estate salesperson in Hawaii pursuant to chapter 467,
when acting in the capacity of a real estate broker or real estate salesperson
in accordance with customary industry standards.

"Distressed property consultant
contract" means any agreement or obligation between an owner or agent of
an owner of a distressed property and a distressed property consultant.

"Distressed property conveyance"
means the transfer of any interest in a distressed property effected directly
or indirectly by or through a distressed property consultant.

"Distressed property conveyance
contract" means any agreement or obligation affecting a distressed
property conveyance.

"Distressed property lease" means any
agreement or obligation regarding the lease or rental of a distressed property
effected directly or indirectly by or through a distressed property consultant
or distressed property purchaser.

"Distressed property owner" or
"property owner" means the owner of any distressed property.

"Distressed property purchaser" means
any person who acquires any interest in a distressed property directly or
indirectly through a distressed property conveyance or distressed property
conveyance contract.

"Fully performed" means:

(1) In the case of relief requiring the consent of
any lending party, the distressed property consultant or attorney has:

(A) Carried out and provided all of the
services the distressed property consultant or attorney contracted to perform
or represented would be performed; and

(B) Obtained from the lending party a written
offer for mortgage assistance relief that the consumer has accepted by
executing the written contract.

(2) In the case of relief requiring the consent of
any non-lending party, including any person that may hold a lien or encumbrance
against any residential real property, the distressed property consultant or
attorney has:

(A) Carried out and provided all of the services
the distressed property consultant or attorney contracted to perform or
represented would be performed; and

(B) Obtained from the non-lending party a
written offer for mortgage assistance relief that the consumer has accepted by
executing the written contract.

(3) In all other cases, being instances where consent
is not obtained as the result of a mortgage assistance relief service, the
property owner obtains the desired relief from a court of law, which includes a
favorable determination that the mortgage assistance relief service conferred a
benefit upon the property owner and is therefore compensable.

"Lending party" means the person from
whom mortgage assistance relief is sought and includes the residential loan
holder or servicer.

"Material" means likely to affect a
consumer's choice of, or conduct regarding, any mortgage assistance relief
service.

"Material fact" DELETED.

"Mortgage assistance relief service"
means any service, plan, or program that is offered or provided to the consumer
in exchange for consideration and is represented, expressly or by implication,
to assist or attempt to assist the consumer with any of the following:

(1) Stopping, preventing, or postponing the loss of
any residential real property, whether by mortgage or deed or trust foreclosure
sale or repossession, or otherwise saving any consumer's residential real
property from foreclosure or repossession;

(2) Stopping, preventing, or postponing the charging
of any lien or encumbrance against any residential real property or reducing or
eliminating any lien or encumbrance charged against any residential real
property for the nonpayment of any taxes, lease assessments, association fees,
or maintenance fees;

(3) Saving the owner's property from foreclosure or
loss of home due to nonpayment of taxes;

(4) Negotiating, obtaining, or arranging any
modification of any term of a residential loan, including a reduction in the
amount of interest, principal balance, monthly payments, or fees;

(5) Negotiating, obtaining, or arranging any
extension of the period of time within which the consumer may:

(A) Cure the default on a residential loan;

(B) Reinstate the residential loan;

(C) Redeem any residential real property; or

(D) Exercise any right to reinstate a
residential loan or redeem a residential real property;

(6) Negotiating, obtaining, or arranging, with
respect to any residential real property:

(A) A short sale;

(B) A deed-in-lieu of foreclosure; or

(C) Any other disposition of the property
other than a sale to a third party who is not the residential loan holder;

(7) Obtaining any forbearance or modification in the
timing of payments from any residential loan holder or servicer;

(8) Obtaining any forbearance from any beneficiary or
mortgagee, or any relief with respect to a tax sale of any residential real
property;

(9) Obtaining any waiver of an acceleration clause or
balloon payment contained in any promissory note or other contract secured by a
mortgage on any residential real property or contained in the mortgage;

(10) Obtaining any extension of the period within
which the owner may reinstate the owner's rights with respect to the owner's
property;

(11) Obtaining a loan or advance of funds while the
consumer is in foreclosure or at risk of foreclosure due to nonpayment of any
obligation related to a residential real property, including but not limited to
one or more loans, taxes, lease assessments, association fees, or maintenance
fees;

(12) Obtaining a loan or advance of funds during any
post-tax sale redemption period;

(13) Considering or deciding whether a consumer should
continue making payments on any loan, taxes, lease assessments, association
fees, or maintenance fees or any other obligation related to a residential real
property;

(14) Exercising any cure of default;

(15) Avoiding or ameliorating the impairment of the
property owner's credit resulting from the recording or filing of a notice of
default or the conduct of a foreclosure sale or tax sale;

(16) Drafting, preparing, performing, creating, or
otherwise obtaining a forensic loan audit, a forensic securitization audit, or
any other type of audit, report, summary, affidavit, or declaration involving
an opinion, determination, or analysis of whether a lending party has an
enforceable mortgage or lien, predicated upon claims that a lending party that
is a party to a pooling and service agreement failed to adhere to the terms of
that agreement, or that errors occurred after the signing of the mortgage loan,
or disputing whether the lending party is the holder of the promissory note, or
any argument that the lending party has failed to comply with federal or state
mortgage lending laws;

(17) Drafting, preparing, performing, creating, or
otherwise obtaining any documentation used or intended to be used to advance
any legal theory in defense of a foreclosure or ejectment action, regardless of
any disclaimer as to providing legal advice; or

(18) Understanding any legal theory that may be used
in defense of a foreclosure or ejectment action, regardless of any disclaimer
as to providing legal advice.

"Person" means any individual,
partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or other
group or entity, however organized.

"Residential loan" means any loan
that is secured by a mortgage against residential real property, regardless of
whether the property owner lacks sufficient equity in the property so as to
render the loan partially or entirely unsecured.

"Residential loan holder" means any
person who holds the residential loan that is the subject of the offer to
provide mortgage assistance relief services.

"Residential real property" means any
fee simple or leasehold real property wherever located, the primary use of
which is occupancy as a residence by any natural person or persons, regardless
of whether the property owner resides on the property.

"Servicer" means the person
responsible for:

(1) Receiving any scheduled periodic payments
pursuant to the terms of the residential loan that is the subject of the offer
to provide mortgage assistance relief services; and

(2) Making the payments of principal and interest and
such other payments with respect to the amounts received from the consumer as
may be required pursuant to the terms of the mortgage servicing loan documents
or servicing contract. [L 2008, c 137, pt of §2; am L 2009, c 66, §2 and c 73,
§2; am L 2014, c 26, §1; am L 2016, c 142, §3]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next